Wyoming statutes. Title 21 Education
Chapter 21 Cooperative Teacher Education

§ 21-21-101.
Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Cooperative Teacher Education Act”.

History.

Laws 1975, ch. 154, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 21-509; Laws 1977, ch. 169, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1957, §

21-6-101

.

§ 21-21-102.
Authority to enter into agreements.

The board of trustees of each school district may enter into written, contractual agreements, or arrangements with any college or university to provide field experiences in teacher education. Field experiences include all activities incurred within the district by a regularly enrolled student in any phase of the teacher education program of the institution regardless of the title of his position.

Each agreement or arrangement shall set out the rights and responsibilities of the cooperating school districts, teacher preparation institutions, students and other participation personnel.

History.

Laws 1975, ch. 154, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 21-510; Laws 1977, ch. 169, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 21-6-102.

§ 21-21-103.
Payment of cost from public funds.

The respective governing boards of state colleges and universities may provide the contracting school district boards of trustees with tuition waivers to be used by the teachers of that district at any college in the state or for any workshop endorsed by the cooperating college or university.

School districts may, by mutual consent of the parties to the agreement, provide compensation to supervisors to students of teaching.

History.

Laws 1975, ch. 154, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 21-511; Laws 1977, ch. 169, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 21-6-103.

§ 21-21-104.
Authority and status of students of teaching.

Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section a student of teaching, during the time he is assigned to a field experience within a public school, is not a public employee of the school district within the meaning of the “Wyoming Education Code of 1969” [§§

21-1-101

through

21-13-721

]. The duties and responsibilities of the student of teaching shall be determined by mutual agreement between the school district and the authorized representative of the college.

The student of teaching, during his field experience, is an employee of the school district pursuant to the provisions of the Wyoming Education Code of 1969, for the purpose of workmen’s compensation and liability insurance as provided for other district employees.

History.

Laws 1975, ch. 154, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 21-512; Laws 1977, ch. 169, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 21-6-104.